Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,116
Income tax; false return; penalty.

Any person who willfully makes and subscribes any return, statement or other document, which contains or is verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury, and which he does not believe to be true and correct as to every material matter; or willfully aids or procures the preparation or presentation in a matter arising under the income tax provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 of a return, affidavit, claim or other document which is fraudulent or is false as to any material matter shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 116, p. 1627;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 244.